Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5966YH (1) 91 lh/ns H.F. 2401 Section 1. Section 21.12, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 5. This section does not apply to a any of the following: 3 a. A member of a governmental body if the member or 4 governmental body is excluded from the jurisdiction of the Iowa 5 public information board under section 23.12 . 6 b. A member of a board, council, or committee that is 7 established solely to provide advice or recommendations, and 8 who is appointed by a school board, city council, or board of 9 supervisors. 10